src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-sináákiatsis_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - sináákia'tsisi - ok : # -m inanimate noun, book AEW NA1
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Sg: sináákia'tsisi
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Pl: sináákia'tsiistsi
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Non: sináákia'tsisi

     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: nisináákia'tsisi
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: nisináákia'tsiistsi
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px1Sg+Non: nisináákia'tsisi

     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: nisináákia'tsinnaani
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: nisináákia'tsinnaanistsi
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px1Pl+Non: nisináákia'tsinnaani

     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Sg: kisináákia'tsinnooni
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Pl: kisináákia'tsinnoonistsi
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px21Pl+Non: kisináákia'tsinnooni

     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: kisináákia'tsisi
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: kisináákia'tsiistsi
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px2Sg+Non: kisináákia'tsisi

     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Sg: kisináákia'tsisoaawayi
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Pl: kisináákia'tsisoaawaistsi
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px2Pl+Non: kisináákia'tsisoaawai

     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: osináákia'tsisi
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: osináákia'tsiistsi
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px3Sg+Non: osináákia'tsisi

     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Sg: osináákia'tsisoaawayi
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Pl: osináákia'tsisoaawaistsi
     sináákia'tsisi+NI+Px3Pl+Non: osináákia'tsisoaawai
